dictionaries/fr_FR/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX b4 er asse/n'q'j'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasse/n'q'j'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er asses/n'q'l'm't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çasses/n'q'l'm't' cer
SFX b4 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çât/n'q'l'm't's' cer
SFX b4 er assions/n'q'l't' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassions/n'q'l't' cer
SFX b4 er assiez/n'q'l'm' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassiez/n'q'l'm' cer
SFX b4 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' [^c]er
SFX b4 cer çassent/n'q'l'm't's' cer
